Missouri, session 2026, HB1684.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 195, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 195.1000, to read as follows:
195.1000. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, ivermectin tablets shall be
2 available to the public through over-the-counter purchase in this state without a
3 prescription or consultation with a pharmacist or other health care professional.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.